District of Columbia statutes.
4-756.01

Contracting authority.

(a)

The Mayor may execute contracts, grants, and agreements as necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

Pursuant to §§ 6-203(17) and 6-225, the Mayor, or his designee, shall have the authority to enter into an agreement with the District of Columbia Housing Authority to allocate available unexpended funds to meet the purposes of this chapter and §§ 6-226 and 6-227.

(c)

Contracted case-management services authorized pursuant to the Housing First program shall include contracted case-management services to assist homeless women and working adults residing at the Federal City Shelter.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 30, 52 DCR 8113
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5004(c), 55 DCR 7598

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-219 designated subsec. (a) and added subsecs. (b) and (c).